District of Columbia statutes.
50-1912

Penalty.

If a person refuses to submit to chemical testing under this subchapter, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall order the person not to operate any watercraft for at least one year. A refusal to submit to any test as required by this section shall be punishable by a fine not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisonment of 90 days, or both.

History

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1017, Pub. L. 92-519, § 7e
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 101(e), 59 DCR 12957
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 270, 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1911.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “fine not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “$500 fine”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 101(e) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 270 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 101(e) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.